Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 3. Deductions; Claims; Assignments.

Sec. 43.23.130.
Contributions from dividends.

Notwithstanding AS

43.23.200

, the Department of Revenue shall prepare the electronic Alaska permanent fund dividend application to allow an applicant who files electronically to direct that money be subtracted from the dividend payment and contributed to the crime victim compensation fund (AS

18.67.162

), the peace officer and firefighter survivors’ fund, or one or more of the educational organizations, community foundations, or charitable organizations that appear on the contribution list contained in the application. A contribution to the crime victim compensation fund, the peace officer and firefighter survivors’ fund or to an organization may be $25, $50, $75, $100, or more, in increments of $50, up to the total amount of the permanent fund dividend that the applicant is entitled to receive. If the total amount of contributions elected by an applicant exceeds the amount of the permanent fund dividend that the applicant is entitled to receive, contributions shall be deducted from the dividend in the order of priority elected by the applicant on the application until the entire amount of the dividend that the applicant is entitled to receive is allocated for contribution. The electronic dividend application form must include notice that seven percent of the money contributed will be used for administrative costs incurred in implementing this section, and money from the dividend fund will not be used for that purpose.

The department shall list each educational organization, community foundation, or charitable organization eligible under (c) and (d) of this section, each university campus that applies under (l) of this section, the crime victim compensation fund, and the peace officer and firefighter survivors’ fund on the contribution list. The department shall maintain an electronic database for the contribution list that is accessible to the public and that permits searches by organization or fund name, geographic location, and type. The department shall provide a statement of the contributions made by an individual that is suitable for federal income tax purposes to each individual who elects to contribute under (a) of this section.

The department may not include a charitable organization, other than a community foundation, on the contribution list for a dividend year unless the purpose of the charitable organization is to provide services for youth development, workforce development, arts and culture, aid and services to the elderly, low-income individuals, individuals in emergency situations, victims of crime, disabled individuals, individuals with mental illness, primary, vocational, and higher education, health and dental care, recreational facilities, child abuse and neglect, economic development, food assistance, libraries, public broadcasting, recycling of waste, animal rescue, and zoos. The department may not include on the contribution list an educational organization, community foundation, or charitable organization that is the affiliate of a group. For purposes of this subsection,

“affiliate” means an organization or foundation that directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, a group;

“group” has the meaning given in AS

15.13.400

(8)(B).

Except for each campus of the University of Alaska, the department may include an educational organization, community foundation, or charitable organization on the contribution list for a current dividend year only if the organization

before March 31 of the qualifying year, files an application for inclusion on the list for that dividend year on the form required by the department;

is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code) as an educational or a charitable organization on the date of application;

was qualified for tax exempt status under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code) as an educational or a charitable organization during the two calendar years that immediately precede the year the application is filed;

unless exempted under federal law, has a current Internal Revenue Service Form 990 on file with the United States Department of the Treasury, Internal Revenue Service, or, if the Internal Revenue Service has granted a filing extension for the current year, has on file that form for the immediately preceding year;

is directed by a voluntary board of directors or local advisory board, a majority of whose members are residents of the state;

if a community foundation, provided in the state aid during the two calendar years that immediately precede the year the application is filed, or, if an education organization or charitable organization, provided in the state services during the two calendar years that immediately precede the year the application is filed;

receives at least $100,000 or five percent of its total annual receipts, whichever is less, from contributions;

has completed and provided to the department a financial audit with an unqualified opinion conducted by an independent certified public accountant for the fiscal year to which the Internal Revenue Service Form 990 required under (4) of this subsection applies; this paragraph applies only to an organization that is required by the federal government to complete a financial audit by an independent certified public accountant; and

does not make grants or contributions to an organization that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(4) or (6).

Unless an appropriation specifically directs that the money be used for costs incurred in implementing this section, the department may not use money from the dividend fund for administrative costs incurred in implementing this section, even if it has been appropriated for costs of administering the dividend program. Contributions shall be distributed to each organization as soon as practicable.

The department shall charge an application fee of $250 for each educational organization, community foundation, or charitable organization that files an application under (d) of this section or for each university campus that files an application under (l) of this section. The application fees shall be separately accounted for under AS

37.05.142

. The annual estimated balance in the account maintained under AS

37.05.142

for application fees collected under this subsection may be appropriated for costs of administering this section.

The department may use an agent or enter into a contract for the implementation and operation of the contribution program under this section. Before executing a contract with a corporation or other organization, the organization must provide a copy of its policies and procedures to the department. A contract entered into under this subsection is exempt from AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

A public agency that claims a dividend on behalf of an individual under AS

43.23.015(e)

may not elect to make contributions from the dividend under (a) of this section.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out the provisions of this section. Notwithstanding this subsection and other provisions of law, a state agency, including the department, may not adopt regulations or otherwise impose requirements or procedures on organizations to implement, interpret, make specific, or otherwise carry out the provisions of this section unless required by the federal government. If an organization disagrees with an action of the department under this section and requests an administrative hearing, the hearing shall be conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

).

By January 20 of each year, the department shall prepare a report identifying the organizations on the contribution list for the immediately preceding year, together with the amount of contributions made to each of the organizations, and shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

A community foundation may not deposit contributions received under this section into a fund that would be included in the definition of a donor advised fund under 26 U.S.C. 4966(d)(2) (Internal Revenue Code).

The University of Alaska shall apply separately for each of the three main campuses to be listed on the contribution list for the current dividend year in the manner prescribed by the department. The University of Alaska may apply for each campus other than the three main campuses to be listed on the contribution list for the current dividend year in the manner prescribed by the department.

In addition to the application fee in (f) of this section, the department shall withhold a coordination fee from each organization, foundation, or university campus that receives contributions under this section in the immediately preceding dividend year. The coordination fee for an organization, foundation, or university campus that receives contributions under this section shall be seven percent of the amount of contributions reported by the department under (j) of this section for the organization, foundation, or university campus for the immediately preceding dividend year. The coordination fee shall be separately accounted for under AS

37.05.142

and shall be accounted for separately from the application fee collected under (f) of this section. The annual estimated balance in the account maintained under AS

37.05.142

for coordination fees collected under this subsection may be appropriated for costs of administering this section. The department may not withhold a coordination fee for contributions to the crime victim compensation fund or the peace officer and firefighter survivors’ fund.

In this section,

“community foundation” means a nonprofit, autonomous, philanthropic institution that is organized and operated primarily as a permanent collection of endowed funds for the long-term benefit of a defined geographic area within one or more municipalities, that has a long-term goal of increasing its permanent unrestricted charitable endowment to benefit the area served, that primarily provides benefits by making grants and may also provide other forms of charitable services, that makes grants that are not limited to providing one type of benefit or to serving one population segment, and that makes grants to multiple grantees;

“peace officer and firefighter survivors’ fund” means the fund established in AS

39.60.010(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 2008; am §§ 2 — 8 ch 22 SLA 2010; am §§ 1 — 6 ch 106 SLA 2014; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 14 SLA 2017; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 21 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (k) was enacted as (

l

); relettered in 2010.

Subsections (

l

) and (m) were enacted as (m) and (n); relettered in 2014.

Subsection (n) was enacted as (k); relettered in 2010 and 2014.

Formerly AS

43.23.062

; renumbered in 2018, at which time “AS

43.23.200

” was substituted for “AS

43.23.069

” to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) in the first and second sentences, inserted “to the peace officer and firefighter survivors’ fund or” following “contributed” or similar; in (b), inserted “, and the peace officer and firefighter survivors' fund” following “(

l

) of this section”, inserted “or fund” following “searches by organization” and made related changes; in (m), added the last sentence, in (n), added (n)(2), and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), in the first sentence, inserted “the crime victim compensation fund (AS

18.67.162

),” following “and contributed to”, in the second sentence, inserted “the crime victim compensation fund,” following “A contribution to”, and made stylistic changes; in (b), in the first sentence, inserted “the crime victim compensation fund,” following “under (

l

) of this section,”; in (m), in the last sentence, inserted “the crime victim compensation fund or” following “for contributions to”.

Sec. 43.23.140.
Exemption of and levy on permanent fund dividends.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, 20 percent of the annual permanent fund dividend payable to an individual is exempt from levy, execution, garnishment, attachment, or any other remedy for the collection of debt. No other exemption applies to a dividend. Notwithstanding other laws, a writ of execution upon a dividend that has not been delivered to the debtor may be served on the commissioner by

certified mail, return receipt requested; or

a civilian process server licensed by the commissioner of public safety using electronic execution procedures, as provided under regulations adopted by the department.

An exemption is not available under this section for permanent fund dividends taken to satisfy

child support obligations required by court order or decision of the child support services agency under AS

25.27.140

—

25.27.220

;

court ordered restitution under AS

12.55.045

—

12.55.051

,

12.55.100

, or AS

47.12.120(b)(4)

;

claims on defaulted education loans under AS

43.23.160

;

court ordered fines;

writs of execution under AS 09.35 of a judgment that is entered

against a minor in a civil action to recover damages and court costs;

under AS

09.65.255

against the parent, parents, or legal guardian of an unemancipated minor;

a debt owed by an eligible individual to an agency of the state, including the University of Alaska, unless the debt is contested and an appeal is pending, or the time limit for filing an appeal has not expired;

a debt owed to a person for a program for the rehabilitation of perpetrators of domestic violence required under AS

12.55.101

, AS

18.66.100(c)(15)

, AS

25.20.061

(3), or AS 33.16.150(f)(2);

a judgment for unpaid rent or damage owed to a landlord by an eligible individual that was a tenant of the landlord; in this paragraph, “tenant” has the meaning given in AS

34.03.360

;

court-ordered forfeiture of an appearance or performance bond under AS

12.30.075

.

Claims listed in (b) of this section have priority in the order listed over other claims on a permanent fund dividend whether payments are sought through legal actions for the collection of debts or through assignments from the debtor.

An assignment of or levy, execution, garnishment, attachment, or other remedy for the collection of debt applied to a dividend for a year may not be accepted by the department before April 1 of that same year. AS

09.38.080(c)

and

09.38.085

do not apply to a levy on a permanent fund dividend. Upon receipt of a writ of execution under (a) of this section or another court order, the commissioner shall deliver to the court that portion of the dividend executed upon along with the case name and number. At the time payment is made to the court, the department shall send to the individual at the address provided in the individual’s dividend application and to the court that issued the writ or order a notice that contains

notification that all or part of the individual’s dividend has been seized under a writ of execution or court order;

the name and address of the court that issued the writ or order;

the case number for which the writ or order was issued;

the amount seized under the writ or order; and

notification that the individual has 30 days from the date the notice is mailed in which to file with the court an objection to the seizure if a mistake has been made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 157 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1985; am § 67 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 1989; am § 3 ch 198 SLA 1990; am §§ 3, 4 ch 52 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 113 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 34 SLA 1995; am § 9 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 63 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1998; am § 92 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 43 SLA 2004; am §§ 2, 3 ch 41 SLA 2008; am §§ 2, 3 ch 79 SLA 2008; am § 12 ch 27 SLA 2014; am § 161 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (b) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004. In 2006, in (b)(5)(B) of this section “AS

09.65.255

” was substituted for “AS

34.50.020

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

34.50.020

.

Formerly AS

43.23.065

; renumbered in 2018, at which time “AS

43.23.160

” was substituted for “AS

43.23.067

” to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Cross references. —

For property exempt from execution generally, see AS 09.38. For effect of the 2008 amendments of subsections (a) and (d) on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 89, see § 5, ch. 41, SLA 2008 and § 4, ch. 79, SLA 2008.

For a statement of legislative intent regarding taxes collected under this section, see sec. 1, ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, added (b)(9), and made a related change.

Sec. 43.23.150.
Claims on reimbursement for court-ordered treatment.

AS 09.38 does not apply to permanent fund dividends taken under AS

47.12.155(c)

. Notwithstanding AS 09.35, execution on a dividend claimed under AS

47.12.155(c)

is accomplished by delivering a certified claim to the department containing the following information:

the name and social security number of the individual whose dividend is being claimed;

the amount the individual owes on the reimbursement claim; and

a statement that

the Department of Health and Social Services has notified the individual that future permanent fund dividends of the individual will be taken to satisfy the reimbursement claim;

the individual was notified of the right to request a hearing and allowed 30 days after the date of the notice described in (A) of this paragraph to request the Department of Health and Social Services to hold a hearing on the reimbursement claim;

the reimbursement claim has not been contested, or, if contested, that the issue has been resolved in favor of the Department of Health and Social Services; and

if the reimbursement claim has been contested and resolved in favor of the Department of Health and Social Services, no appeal is pending, the time limit for filing an appeal has expired, or the appeal has been resolved in favor of the Department of Health and Social Services.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall notify the individual if a dividend is claimed under (a) of this section. The notice shall be sent to the address provided in the individual’s permanent fund dividend application and must provide the following information:

the amount of the reimbursement claim;

notice that the permanent fund dividend, or that portion of the permanent fund dividend that does not exceed the amount of the reimbursement claim, shall be paid to the Department of Health and Social Services; and

notification that the individual has a right to request a hearing and has 30 days after the date the notice is mailed in which to file with the Department of Health and Social Services an objection to the dividend claim if a mistake has been made.

AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

apply to a hearing requested by an individual under (b)(3) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 144 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in subsection (a), “AS

47.12.155(c)

” was substituted for “AS 47.10.079(c)” under § 7, ch. 144, SLA 1996.

Formerly AS

43.23.066

; renumbered in 2018.

Sec. 43.23.160.
Claims of defaulted education loans.

AS 09.38 does not apply to a permanent fund dividend taken under AS

14.43.145

. Notwithstanding AS 09.35, the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education may take a permanent fund dividend under AS

14.43.145

by delivering a claim to the department certifying the following information:

the name and social security number of the individual whose dividend is being claimed;

the amount the individual owes on a loan awarded under AS 14.43; and

a statement that the loan is in default under AS 14.43.145, or, if the individual has requested review of the status of the loan under AS

14.43.145(c)

, that a final determination has been made that the loan is in default.

The Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education shall notify the individual of a claim under (a) of this section. The notice shall be sent to the address provided in the individual’s permanent fund dividend application and must provide the following information:

the amount of the claim;

notice that the amount of the permanent fund dividend up to the amount of the claim shall be paid to the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education to be credited against the individual’s loan balance; and

the individual’s right to a hearing under (c) of this section.

Within 30 days after the date of the notice under (b) of this section, the individual may request a hearing. AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

apply to a hearing under this section. At the hearing, the borrower has the burden to show that

the commission has not sent a notice of default in compliance with AS

14.43.145(b)

;

the notice of default has been rescinded after review under AS

14.43.145(c)

; or

the amount owed by the borrower is less than the amount claimed from the permanent fund dividend.

If the amount owed by the borrower is determined under (c) of this section to be some amount greater than $0, but less than the amount claimed, the commission may amend its claim to the amount determined to be owing.

History.

(§ 18 ch 92 SLA 1987; am §§ 5, 6 ch 52 SLA 1992; am § 17 ch 54 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.067

; renumbered in 2018.

Sec. 43.23.170.
Claims on defaulted public assistance overpayment.

AS 09.38 does not apply to permanent fund dividends taken under AS

47.05.080(b)

. Notwithstanding AS 09.35, execution on a dividend claimed under AS

47.05.080(b)

is accomplished by delivering a certified claim to the department containing the following information:

the name and social security number of the individual whose dividend is being claimed;

the amount the individual owes on the overpayment claim; and

a statement that

the Department of Health and Social Services has notified the individual that future permanent fund dividends of the individual will be taken to satisfy the overpayment claim;

the individual was notified of the right to request a hearing and allowed 30 days from the date of the notice under (A) of this paragraph to request the Department of Health and Social Services to hold a hearing on the overpayment claim;

the overpayment claim has not been contested, or, if contested, that the issue has been resolved in favor of the Department of Health and Social Services; and

if the overpayment claim has been contested and resolved in favor of the Department of Health and Social Services, no appeal is pending, the time limit for filing an appeal has expired, or the appeal has been resolved in favor of the Department of Health and Social Services.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall notify the individual if a dividend is claimed under (a) of this section. The notice shall be sent to the address provided in the individual’s permanent fund dividend application and must provide the following information:

the amount of the overpayment claim;

notice that the amount of the permanent fund dividend that does not exceed the amount of the overpayment claim shall be paid to the Department of Health and Social Services; and

notification that the individual has a right to request a hearing and has 30 days from the date the notice is mailed in which to file with the Department of Health and Social Services an objection to the dividend claim if a mistake has been made.

AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

apply to a hearing requested by an individual under (b)(3) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 35 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.068

; renumbered in 2018.

Sec. 43.23.180.
Claims for amounts owed under the Alaska Employment Security Act.

AS 09.38 does not apply to permanent fund dividends taken by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for a claim for payment of money owed under AS 23.20 (Alaska Employment Security Act). Notwithstanding AS 09.35, execution on a dividend claimed under this section is accomplished by delivering a certified claim to the Department of Revenue containing the following information:

the name and social security number of the individual whose dividend is being claimed; if the Department of Labor and Workforce Development does not have access to the individual’s social security number for this purpose, the department may supply other identification information authorized under regulations to make a claim under AS

43.23.140

;

the amount the individual owes on the claim under AS 23.20;

a statement that

the Department of Labor and Workforce Development has notified the individual that future permanent fund dividends of the individual will be taken to satisfy the claim under AS 23.20;

the individual was notified of the right to request a hearing under AS 23.20 and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development has allowed the individual at least 30 days after the date of the notice described in (A) of this paragraph to request a hearing on the claim;

the claim under AS 23.20 has not been contested, or, if contested, the issue has been resolved in favor of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development; and

if the claim under AS 23.20 has been contested and resolved in favor of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, an appeal is not pending, the time limit for filing an appeal has expired, or the appeal has been resolved in favor of the department.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall notify the individual if a dividend is claimed under (a) of this section. The notice shall be sent to the mailing address provided in the individual’s permanent fund dividend application and must provide the following information:

the amount of the claim under AS 23.20;

notice that the permanent fund dividend, or that portion of the permanent fund dividend that does not exceed the amount of the claim under AS 23.20, shall be paid to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development in accordance with priorities established in state law;

notice that the individual has a right to request a hearing and has a specific time after the date that the notice is mailed in which to file with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development an objection to paying the claim from the individual’s permanent fund dividend.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

apply to a hearing requested by an individual under (b) of this section. The hearing

is limited to issues of identity of the individual and whether an amount is still owing in the claim under AS 23.20; and

may be conducted telephonically or in writing.

If the Department of Labor and Workforce Development has a notification or hearing procedure established in statute or regulation, the department may instead use that notification and hearing procedure so long as

the procedure provides at least the minimum time for notice specified in (a)(3)(B) of this section for the individual to request a hearing;

the notice includes the statements required by (b) of this section; and

the hearing is limited to the issues specified in (c)(1) of this section.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development may adopt regulations to implement this section under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

In a claim for payment under this section, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development may include only fines, penalties, overpayments, attorney fees, costs, and other amounts that

are owed the department under other provisions of state law under which the claim under AS 23.20 is being made; and

have been established by court judgment or administrative order.

History.

(§ 2 ch 64 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.072

; renumbered in 2018, at which time “AS

43.23.140

” was substituted for “AS

43.23.065

” to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 43.23.190.
Claims of the University of Alaska.

AS 09.38 does not apply to a permanent fund dividend taken under AS

14.40.251

. Notwithstanding AS 09.35, the University of Alaska may take a permanent fund dividend under AS

14.40.251

by delivering a claim to the department certifying the following information:

the name and social security number of the individual whose dividend is being claimed;

the amount the individual owes the university; and

a statement that

the amount claimed is in default under AS 14.40.251;

the university has notified the individual that future permanent fund dividends will be taken to satisfy the claim;

the individual was notified of the right to request a hearing and allowed 30 days after the date of the notice described in (B) of this paragraph to request the university to hold a hearing on the claim;

the claim has not been contested or, if contested, the issue has been resolved in favor of the university; and

if the claim has been contested and resolved in favor of the university, no appeal is pending, the time limit for filing an appeal has expired, or the appeal has been resolved in favor of the university.

The University of Alaska shall notify the individual of a claim under (a) of this section. The notice shall be sent to the address provided in the individual’s permanent fund dividend application and must provide the following information:

the amount of the claim;

notice that the amount of the permanent fund dividend up to the amount of the claim shall be paid to the university to be credited against the individual’s default balance; and

notice of the individual’s right to a hearing under (c) of this section.

Within 30 days after the date of the notice under (b) of this section, the individual may request a hearing. AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

apply to a hearing under this subsection. At the hearing, the individual has the burden to show that

the university has not sent a notice of default in compliance with AS

14.40.251(b)

;

the notice of default has been rescinded after review under AS

14.40.251(c)

; or

the amount owed by the individual is less than the amount claimed from the permanent fund dividend.

If the amount owed is determined under (c) of this section to be some amount greater than $0, but less than the amount claimed, the University of Alaska may amend its claim to the amount determined to be owing.

History.

(§ 3 ch 43 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.073

; renumbered in 2018.

Sec. 43.23.200.
Assignments.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person eligible to receive a permanent fund dividend may not assign the right to the dividend. An attempted assignment of the right to receive a permanent fund dividend is against public policy and is void.

A person may assign the right to receive a permanent fund dividend to a federal, state, or municipal government agency or to a court.

For purposes of this section, “state agency” includes a regional housing authority created under AS

18.55.996

.

History.

(§ 15 ch 4 SLA 1992; am § 17 ch 4 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) enacted as AS 43.23.095(b).
Renumbered in 1992.

Formerly AS

43.23.069

; renumbered in 2018.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Sec. 43.23.210.
Fees for processing claims and assignments.

The department shall by regulation adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) establish fees for processing claims on dividends received by the department under AS

43.23.140

,

43.23.160

, or

43.23.180

and for processing assignments of dividends received by the department under AS

43.23.200(b)

. The fees shall cover the administrative expenses of the department associated with the claims and assignments. Fees shall be deducted from the amount of the dividend remaining after payment of the portion claimed or assigned, or, if the entire dividend is claimed or assigned, the fees shall be deducted before the dividend is paid to the creditor or assignee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.071

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.